Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2174.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6314. Use of automated license plate reader information prohibited.(a) Prohibition.--A law enforcement agency may not sell, share, allow access to or transfer automated license plate reader information to any Federal, State or local governmental agency for the purpose of investigating or enforcing a law that denies or interferes with a person's right to obtain:(1) information that is medically accurate and medically appropriate; or(2) a medical service that is evidence-based and medically appropriate.123456789101112131415161718 (b) Written declaration.--Prior to sharing automated license plate reader information with a Federal, State or local governmental agency, a law enforcement agency must first obtain a written declaration from the Federal, State or local governmental agency that expressly affirms the automated license plate reader information obtained shall not be used in a manner that violates subsection (a). If a written declaration of affirmation is not executed, the law enforcement agency may not share the automated license plate reader information with the Federal, State or local governmental agency.(c) Confidentiality.--Automated license plate reader information shall be held confidentially to the fullest extent permitted by law.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Automated license plate reader information." Information gathered by an automated license plate reader system or created from the analysis of data generated by an automated license plate reader system."Automated license plate reader system." A system of one or more mobile cameras, combined with computer algorithms, to convert images of registration plates and vehicles into computer-readable data for law enforcement and public safety purposes. The term does not include electronic devices used solely for traffic violations or tolling purposes."Evidence-based." The use of current best evidence in making decisions about the care of an individual patient and integrating individual clinical expertise with the best available external clinical evidence from systematic research.20260HB2174PN2830 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Law enforcement agency." As defined in 44 Pa.C.S. § 7202 (relating to definitions)."Medically accurate." One of the following:(1) verified or supported by the weight of peer-reviewed medical research conducted in compliance with accepted scientific methods;(2) recognized as correct and objective by leading medical organizations with relevant expertise; or(3) recommended by or affirmed in the medical practice guidelines of a nationally recognized accrediting organization."Medically appropriate." Consistent with all of the following:(1) applicable legal, health and professional standards;(2) a patient's clinical and other circumstances; and(3) a patient's reasonably known wishes and beliefs.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2174PN2830 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617